Utah statutes.
58-11a-306.   Apprenticeship.

(1)  An approved barber apprenticeship shall:

(a)  consist of not less than 1,250 hours of training in not less than eight months; and

(b)  be conducted by a supervisor who:

(i)  is licensed under this chapter as a barber instructor or a cosmetology/barber instructor; and

(ii)  provides direct one-on-one supervision of the barber apprentice during the apprenticeship program.

(2)  An approved cosmetologist/barber  apprenticeship shall:

(a)  consist of not less than 2,500 hours of training in not less than 15 months; and

(b)  be conducted by a supervisor who:

(i)  is licensed under this chapter as a cosmetologist/barber  instructor; and

(ii)  provides direct one-on-one supervision of the cosmetologist/barber  apprentice during the apprenticeship program.

(3)  An approved esthetician apprenticeship shall:

(a)  consist of not less than 800 hours of training in not less than five months; and

(b)  be conducted by a supervisor who:

(i)  is licensed under this chapter as an esthetician instructor; and

(ii)  provides direct one-on-one supervision of the esthetician apprentice during the apprenticeship program.

(4)  An approved master esthetician apprenticeship shall:

(a)  consist of not less than 1,500 hours of training in not less than 10 months; and

(b)  be conducted by a supervisor who:

(i)  is licensed under this chapter as a master-level esthetician instructor; and

(ii)  provides direct one-on-one supervision of the master esthetician apprentice during the apprenticeship program.

(5)  An approved nail technician apprenticeship shall:

(a)  consist of not less than 375 hours of training in not less than three months; and

(b)  be conducted by a supervisor who:

(i)  is licensed under this chapter as a nail technician instructor or a cosmetology/barber instructor; and

(ii)  provides direct one-on-two supervision of the nail technician apprentice during the apprenticeship program.



Amended by Chapter 130, 2009 General Session

